District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1105.02

Persons required to register.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 462, Pub. L. 93-376, title V, § 502
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title III, § 302, 23 DCR 2050
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(r), 29 DCR 458
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1271, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1162, 57 DCR 6242
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1452.
1973 Ed., § 1-1172.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 1802 of the Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-222, September 24, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 9859).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1271 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1271 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1802 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1802 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1162 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1270 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle BB of title I of the act may be cited as the “Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 1161 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle Q of title I of the act may be cited as the “Lobbyist Administration and Enforcement Fund Establishment Amendment Act of 2010”.